



Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version























Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford




















































 
















»
 Search 


Everything
---CLASSICAL---
Composer
Title
Conductor
Performer
Ensemble
Work
Artist
Title
Song
SoundTrack
Label









Existing Customer?Sign In












All

MP3 Downloads

Classical

Vinyl LP

Turn Pop-up Images Off



















Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford CD
Verdi



CD For Sale Backorder Add to WishList


 
Email Me When AvailableCD Universe will email you only once and only regarding the availability of this item. See our policy statement.














 Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford  Product Information


CategoryClassical, Live Performances, Romantic Period, Mass, Requiem



 Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford  Related Items


<


Most Relaxing Classical Music i...

 
$11.45







Chris Botti
Italia

 
$6.99







Essential Guitar: 34 Gu... 
Essential Guitar

 
$11.59







Catherine Russell
Harlem on My Mind

 
$16.29






Placido Domingo / Il Vo... 
Notte Magica: A Tribute to the ...

 
$13.69






Richard Rodgers
Victory At Sea

 
$11.25







Andres Segovia
Best of Andres Segovia: The Mil...

 
$10.29






Mormon Tabernacle Choir
Ultimate Christmas Collection

 
$11.85






Mormon Tabernacle Choir
Greatest Hits

 
$7.35







Narciso Yepes
Malaguena: Spanish Guitar Music

 
$6.69







Andrea Bocelli
Best Of Andrea Bocelli: Vivere

 
$14.69







Jackie Evancho
Dream with Me

 
$7.35






Luciano Pavarotti
Pavarotti: The 50 Greatest Trac...

 
$12.61






Yo-Yo Ma / Edgar Meyer ... 
Bach: Trios

 
$16.59






Ennio Morricone
Good, the Bad and the Ugly

 
$10.29






Andrew Lloyd Webber
Phantom of the Opera

 
$21.65







Lindsey Stirling
Brave Enough

 
$13.75






Vangelis
Mythodea: Music for the NASA Mi...

 
$10.09






Guitar Greats: The Best of New ...

 
$17.85






Andrea Bocelli: Under the Deser...

 
$20.49






Tyler Bates / Joel Rich... 
John Wick

 
$17.65






Vangelis
Rosetta

 
$14.65






Jackie Evancho
Two Hearts

 
$13.69






Warlock
Triumph & Agony

 
$7.35







Jacques Loussier
My Personal Favorites: Jacques ...

 
$19.99






Mike Oldfield
Tubular Bells

 
$12.45






Louis Clark / Royal Phi... 
Hooked on Classics

 
$8.69






Tom Newman
Meet Joe Black

 
$9.55







Most Romantic Classical Music i...

 
$11.45






Trans-Siberian Orchestr... 
Christmas Eve and Other Stories

 
$8.99






Leopold Stokowski
Rhapsodies

 
$11.49




 
 
 
 
 
>













 Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford  Product Description

Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford  by Verdi was released on the Bainbridge label. Oberlin Musical Union & Orchestra.




 Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford Album Track Listing


TrkSong   
1Messa Da Requiem: Orch Tuning And Intro Applause 
2Messa Da Requiem: Requiem And Kyrie 
Additional Track Information Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford 
3Messa Da Requiem: Dies Irae 
Disc 2
Additional Track Information Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford 
1Messa Da Requiem: Domine Jesu 
2Messa Da Requiem: Sanctus 
Additional Track Information Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford 
3Messa Da Requiem: Agnus Dei 
4Messa Da Requiem: Lux Aeterna 
Additional Track Information Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford 
5Messa Da Requiem: Libera Me 



 Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawford  Product Details


Item  number1067034
LabelBainbridge
Catalog number2103
Discs2
Also Known AsRobert Earl Keen - Live from Austin, Texas







Have you heard this album? 







Browse
› Top Sellers
› Future Releases
› Bargain Bin
› Classical on DVD
› Super Audio CDs
› Enhanced CDs
› Box Sets



By ComposerMore > 



› Bach
› Beethoven
› Brahms
› Debussy
› Dvor�k
› Handel
› Liszt
› Mendelssohn
› Mozart
› Puccini
› Schubert
› Vivaldi


By Category


› Conductors
› Performers
› Orchestras
› Works

By LabelMore > 

› Berlin Classics
› Chandos
› CPO
› Decca
› Deutsche  Grammophon
› EMI Classics
› EMI Music Distrib.
› Hyperion
› Naxos
› Sony Music

Browse MusicMore > 

› Blues
› Easy Listening
› International
› Jazz
› Live Performance
› Oldies
› Rock/Pop

















We Need Your Support







We Need Your Support



















cdu4asppid classical 1067034 cdu4pidall cdu4pls7 ver261cdu cdu4all 
7/26/2017 6:12:25 PM
XPreRip Terms and ConditionsPreRip is a free option on select CD's displaying the PreRip icon. This option allows you to download the MP3 version of that CD immediately after your purchase. The physical CD will still be shipped to you. If you agree to accept your PreRip MP3s, please be aware that the corresponding CD will be non-refundable and cannot be canceled from your order. This protects us against customers taking the free MP3 and then canceling the CD.PreRip availability may change at any time, so we recommend that you download as soon as possible.Should the CD you receive be defective, we will exchange it for a new one. PreRip is only available to customers in the United States. This is a limitation placed on us by the record labels.




Verdi: Requiem Live / Moe, James, Shafer, Farina, Crawf...
Close 










	UNCLE MOE Trademark of Korkowski; James F.. Serial Number: 73212607 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Hand Tool Products
UNCLE MOE










 
Get FREE email alerts













UNCLE MOE  Trademark Information
 Korkowski; James F.
Animal Restraining Devices in the Nature of an Adjustable Frame Having Spaced Supporting Arms with Retractable Loops at Their Outer Ends for Receiving the Legs of the Animal and Suspending Same Thereby




Perfect for these industries

Hand Tool Products





Words that describe this mark
animal   restraining   devices   nature   adjustable   frame   having   spaced   supporting   arms   retractable   loops   outer   ends   receiving   legs   animal   suspending    
                                    




This is a brand page for the UNCLE MOE trademark by Korkowski; James F. 
                                in Brandon, , 56315.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this UNCLE MOE trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Korkowski; James F. of the UNCLE MOE trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the UNCLE MOE trademark.
                           






On Monday, April 23, 1979,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        UNCLE MOE by 
                        Korkowski; James F., Brandon 56315.
                        The USPTO has given the UNCLE MOE 
                        trademark serial  number of  73212607.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is CONTINUED USE NOT FILED WITHIN GRACE PERIOD, UN-REVIVABLE.
                        The correspondent listed for UNCLE MOE is 
                        
                        
                                            Schroeder, Siegfried, Ryan, of 
                                            Vidas & Steffey,  2340 IDS Center, Minneapolis MN   55402 
                                .
                            The UNCLE MOE trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Hand Tool Products
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for UNCLE MOE 
                            is Animal Restraining Devices in the Nature of an Adjustable Frame Having Spaced Supporting Arms with Retractable Loops at Their Outer Ends for Receiving the Legs of the Animal and Suspending Same Thereby. 
                            





Word mark:
 UNCLE MOE


  Status/Status Date:  


CONTINUED USE NOT FILED WITHIN GRACE PERIOD, UN-REVIVABLE

1/7/1988



  Serial Number:  
73212607


  Filing Date:  
4/23/1979


 Registration Number:  
1156147 


 Registration Date:  
6/2/1981


 Goods and Services: 
Animal Restraining Devices in the Nature of an Adjustable Frame Having Spaced Supporting Arms with Retractable Loops at Their Outer Ends for Receiving the Legs of the Animal and Suspending Same Thereby


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
TradeMark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
3/10/1981


Last Applicant/Owner:

Korkowski; James F.Brandon 56315
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Typeset (Words/letter/Number)


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 (NOT AVAILABLE)


 Correspondent:


Schroeder, Siegfried, Ryan,
Vidas & Steffey
2340 IDS Center
Minneapolis MN   55402






 Use in Commerce Trademark - Applicant has provided proof of use of this mark in commerce to USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (008) - Hand tools and implements (hand-operated); cutlery; side arms; razors. 


First Use Anywhere: 
1/17/1958


First Use In Commerce: 
1/17/1958





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your UNCLE MOE trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

1/7/1988
CONTINUED USE NOT FILED WITHIN GRACE PERIOD, UN-REVIVABLE


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



Schroeder, Siegfried, Ryan,


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of UNCLE MOE trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search unclemoe on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for UNCLE MOE 




UNCLE MOE is providing Animal Restraining Devices in the Nature of an Adjustable Frame Having Spaced Supporting Arms with Retractable Loops at Their Outer Ends for Receiving the Legs of the Animal and Suspending Same Thereby.
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 





















James Moe | CDD Spotlight Interview


















































CDD Spotlight Interview with James Moe – President, CEO and a co-founder of Oligomerix
“We’re using CDD Vault as a way of storing our chemical structures, as a way of searching them, as a way of storing all of our assay data. We’re also using it for doing calculations, for analyzing our data, for creating reports and communicating the data to others, and then also, very importantly, for working securely with collaborators. So it’s been instrumental for all of those purposes.”


James Moe
President, CEO and a co-founder of Oligomerix
Dr. Moe has 20+ years industrial experience having held senior management positions in product development working on international teams in both early and late stage diagnostic, biotechnology and biopharmaceutical companies including Gene-Trak/Amoco Technology Ventures/Vysis, bioMerieux, and Mosaic Technologies. Prior to founding Oligomerix, he was Director of Product Development at Pyrosequencing, Senior Molecular Biologist at Spire Biomedical, and Director of Product Development at Q-RNA, Inc.
Dr. Moe received his Ph.D. degree in Molecular Biology/Molecular Biophysics from Wesleyan University, did his postdoctoral studies at Vanderbilt University in the Center for Molecular Toxicology where he was jointly appointed in the Biochemistry Department in the Medical School, and the Chemistry Department in the College of Arts and Sciences, and has an MBA degree with a concentration in entrepreneurial studies from Boston University.

Interviewed by Shirley Louise-May, Collaborative Drug Discovery, Inc.
I’m here with James Moe, President and CEO and a co-founder of Oligomerix. Oligomerix is a small biotech company primarily interested in addressing tauopathies. Tau is a protein in the central nervous system (CNS) that has been implicated in neurodegeneration if there are problems with the pathways downstream or upstream of tau. James, could you introduce us to the nature of Oligomerix’s research?
Sure, I’m James Moe, President and CEO of Oligomerix. We’re a company that’s focused on tau as a therapeutic target of neurodegeneration for Alzheimer’s disease (AD) but the work that we’re doing also applies to numerous other diseases. In fact, there’s about twenty different tauopathies that are known to date. Alzheimer’s disease (AD) is a dementia that is characterized by the pathological hallmarks, plaques and tangles composed primarily of aggregated amyloid beta or tau protein, respectively.
When we embarked on this project we chose to go after tau as a target based on the reproducible pattern of the development and spread of tau pathology during the course of AD, and because it was a differentiated approach from most other programs that were targeting the amyloid pathway. We also decided to further differentiate ourselves by targeting the oligomeric aggregates of tau rather than the larger and more inert fibril aggregates of tau. Now, after having embarked on this path about eleven years ago or so, most of the drug candidates developed against the amyloid target have failed in late stage clinical trials. So increasingly, there’s a lot of interest in Tau as a target and we have a pretty decent head start there. We’ve always believed that it’s an important target for AD, so we’re trying to discover drugs that prevent Tau from aggregating and developing its neurotoxic function.
 
Very Nice. Now that you’ve told me about the nature of your research, I’d like to hear more details of your approach, like what is the end goal, and what are either your modest or the more audacious goals of your programs? 
At Oligomerix we’re developing proximity-based screening assays for identifying inhibitors that prevent tau from self-associating at the beginning of the aggregation process. Our end goal would be to identify compounds that we could take into clinical studies – that is the ultimate end goal – and that would require us to bring a partner on board and to get to IND enabling studies. Right now we are in the candidate lead optimization stage for the project.
 
So how did you come up with the active compounds that you’ve found so far? Up until this point have you only used the biology as a guide? Have you been screening library compounds without medicinal chemistry support? 
No, we’ve used both supports. On the biology side, initially, when we decided to embark on a program to screen against tau as a target, we wanted a solid foundation for the research. So we decided not to use the fibrillation type of assays that people were using because they are not physiological, that was our departure from the norm. Secondly, most other researchers in the field didn’t use full length tau for technical reasons. Third, most everybody else was using tau sequences with mutations that are not present in AD. Finally, they were using aggregation enhancers or facilitators in their assays. We decided, since we’re trying to prevent tau-tau interaction by development of a proximity assay, that we needed to work with full length tau. Because – importantly – if we prevent tau from aggregating, we would want to have normal tau that could still be functional or would be able to undergo normal clearance. In choosing this path we were able to discover, for the first time, tau’s ability to self-truncate once it forms these types of aggregates. Other people missed that because they were using already truncated tau.
Initially, our medicinal chemistry was internal and basic – looking through our hits and then designing new structures. When our medicinal chemist left, at the time we thought it would be a very temporary solution, we decided to do our chemistry through a CRO. We still work with a third party who does all our medicinal chemistry, but have now brought on a consultant medicinal chemist and intend to bring this function in-house.
Ultimately, our end goal is to enable a large pharma to more rapidly bring candidates into the clinic. We, as a small entity, would not be able to do that on our own or in a timely manner, to bring the funding along to do that, or to have the expertise for the full ride. However, we would like to enable our strategic partner to do that to enable our global common audacious goal of finding effective therapeutics for AD.
 
OK. At Oligomerix, what are the means to the end (however you interpret that question)? 
So the means are – my interpretation – how do you get there? So that’s the money question, that’s how I interpret it. Well, we started this project with two scientists plus myself and got Oligomerix started by writing an NIH grant – an SBIR. That’s how we got the company off the ground. NIH has been a very good partner. We’ve raised our own money, too. Actually, half of the money we’ve raised comes from NIH grants and the other half from investors. Most of our investors are individual investors although we have one institutional investor right now, Wheatley Partners. Ultimately, it’s the investment dollars that come in that enable this program. So that’s what I would interpret as the means. But also, to be in this business, you need to have novel technology. In terms of Oligomerix, the majority of the technology we are using we’ve developed inside the company. So, in other words, we created it, we’re not in-licensing our novel methods from an academic institution. I think that sets us apart as a small company in this field.
 
In the area of tauopathies, what new techniques or information have you found particularly interesting? 
Well, as an example of one of the interesting things, because we were working with full length tau, we found that tau was self-truncating, and the question is ‘What is the purpose of that function?’ Specifically, tau has an intrinsic proteolytic function, so that when it forms certain types of aggregates, it self-truncates. So, the real question is whether the function is pathological or protective? In trying to understand why this function may have developed in tau, we noted that tau is a protein that stabilizes microtubules. So why would it have an intrinsic proteolytic function? Well, it also turns out that tau is involved in the stress response system. Work in other labs has shown that if you treat cells in culture with oxidative conditions, tau goes into the nucleus and somehow reduces the number of double strand breaks in the DNA. I speculate that this novel function may be involved in that process and that maybe, this function is going awry in the rest of the neuron in AD. This is consistent with our finding that expression of some of these truncated fragments of tau is toxic. From a purely scientific perspective, tau is a fascinating protein to be working on as its normal and disease-related functions are still being unraveled inside and outside of neurons.
 
So can I just ask a clarification – is tau’s proteolytic function something that you believe should be only functional in the nucleus and in a disease state it’s happening outside the nucleus? 
Yes. However, there may be other normal functions for tau proteolytic activity, as well both inside and outside of cells that we have not considered.
 
OK, so how does Oligomerix use CDD Vault? And why did you choose CDD Vault? 
One of the reasons why we chose CDD Vault over other packages that we were looking at was that we felt that CDD fit well, given that we’re a smaller entity, and we didn’t want to choose packages where we thought that big pharma was going to be able to muscle away the attention of the provider. So we thought that they fit well with our size and they had all the features that we needed. Indeed, their customer service has been exemplary!
How are we using it? Well we’re using CDD Vault as a way of storing our chemical structures, as a way of searching them, as a way of storing all of our assay data. We’re also using it for doing calculations, for analyzing our data, for creating reports and communicating the data to others, and then also, very importantly, for working securely with collaborators. So it’s been instrumental for all of those purposes. And when we get into a partnership, we are looking forward to both ourselves and our partnering company being able to access some of the same data and contributing data into the same database, CDD Vault is very functional for that. Another primary concern is having a database where we have better security over our molecules.
 
And you believe that you have better security with a cloud-hosted solution like CDD Vault than you might have had in-house? 
I think so, yes.
 
And in securely exchanging data with partners? 
Yes.
 
So, I have to ask if you’ve ever gone the DropBox option? 
We need more powerful drug discovery capabilities than merely a file exchange folder provides. However, we now use DropBox for standard documents as well.
 
But it has no functionality? 
Yeah, basically. We are also using Merrill database for data sharing and have a lot of other types of data that we put in the Merrill database. We just keep it open all the time because it’s pretty cost effective, given the amount of data we have relative to say a larger company. You know, those are the two kinds of cloud-based type hosted solutions we use at Oligomerix; CDD Vault and Merrill. Then there’s still a lot we’re doing internally. We are looking for more ways to leverage using the cloud, but at the same time we want to be smart about doing it, so we’re sort of being careful in how we implement it and only use providers with trusted track records like CDD, which has been securely hosting sensitive data for a long-time.
 
So, how long you’ve been using CDD Vault? If you want to, can you enumerate some of the things that you like about it and some of the things that you hope will either be coming in future upgrades or things that you think would, if they were addressed, make the product even better. 
Yes, I can easily think of two or three things we like about it. I think the search functionalities have been very useful. We’ve been happy with those and also the reports that we create. Also, being able to easily update protocols. It’s been very good too, as we develop new assays, then, to design them so that we can use them to calculate IC50’s and derived parameters like that. I also really like that the physico-chemical properties are present so you can, if you’re making a report, check off the ones you want and that sort of thing.
 
How long have you been using CDD Vault? 
Let’s see, I’m trying to think exactly. We are in our third year now using CDD Vault.
 
Right, and you do mostly compound-centric searches or assay-centric searches? I mean, what kind of searches do you most commonly use? 
We have many of both compound- and assay-centric searches. One thing we haven’t done, is, put a lot of the imaging data into CDD vault, but that’s something I’d like to do in the future. We do have that kind of data, you know, but right now people maintain that separately. One issue that I already talked to Charlie Weatherall about is in the graphing of curves. When you have outliers on your plots, you can sequester the outliers but it doesn’t automatically change the axis of the plot. We haven’t yet figured out how to change the axis automatically but it seems there must be a way. So that part, I think, is one little area that could be improved, however the good news is that you can manually remove outliers. But these are little things that could be addressed, as we don’t get that many outliers. I was telling one of my technicians, ‘just don’t have outliers and we won’t have to worry about it!’
 
Sure, I bet he loved that. All right, can you also describe the reports that you generate? Are they primarily for internal use? 
Yes, internally or with our CRO, we selectively and securely share our CDD Vault also with our CRO. But we create our reports with password protection, so, a little different than what others do, the good news is with CDD Vault you can provide different levels of access privileges to different projects. So when we create an Excel file then, if it has structures, we save it as a password-protected file and then when we send it to our CRO’s that way. Then, in a separate email we send them the password. That, we feel, gives us some level of security that somebody won’t intercept both messages and get sensitive information. We just want to be cognizant that we’re protecting our structural information more than anything.
 
All right. So why don’t you describe a memorable interaction you’ve recently had with another brilliant scientist? 
Well, when I was at the Alzheimer’s International conference this year, there was a lot of talk about Tau PET ligands. As some people who work in the field know, over the last few years there has been a lot of advancement in amyloid research because of amyloid imaging capability. Now, finally, tau PET ligands are available and are being validated. What was fascinating was, when you look at amyloid and tau imaging patterns in the same brains, you might have both amyloid pathology and tau pathology. And if you look at where the two pathologies are overlapping you see regions of hypo-connectivity. So, in other words, because of this hypo-connectivity or concentrated protein aggregation, there is the potential for loss of function in those regions. Nobody really has demonstrated that, but when I was talking to the Chief Scientist of Advent and he pointed those regions out to me, I thought that was very fascinating because it implies that there’s a lot of neuronal loss occurring in the places where the two pathologies are occurring in the same region. And I think that’s saying something about the disease mechanism, that maybe both pathologies are necessary for synaptic loss. I think it’s fascinating because for so many years, researchers have been struggling to understand what the relationship between these two pathologies. So I think we’re finally starting to get at that becoming clearer with this new imaging data. What I found was amazing, sitting in that hall that day, seeing a lot of good presentations of tau imaging data, that this is all new – it’s new to everybody in this room. These are the world’s experts on tau imaging and to hear them, sitting there, seeing it, at the same time with everyone else, it felt like, wow, it’s almost like you’re looking up the road and you know these are the tools that are going to help us. They’re going to help us find treatments that actually can cure or slow down or halt or arrest neurodegeneration and that’s really exciting. What a treat, as a scientist, to be sitting in that room.
 
What technologies do you use for your research? And why?
When we embarked upon this project, we developed a novel proximity screening assay where we were able to screen large chemical libraries and then used cellular assays as secondary screens. Then, to demonstrate that our screening assays are selecting compounds that will work in vivo, we conduct mouse studies. Yet, the problem with doing mouse studies is that there isn’t any mouse model that really recapitulates Alzheimer’s disease and so you’re only looking at a mechanistic piece of the disease. In our case, because tau was our target, we were looking at the tauopathy models. Now, nine out of ten of those models have frontal temporal dementia mutations that are completely irrelevant to Alzheimer’s disease so that’s one of the shortcomings. Being a mechanistic piece of the disease and not the whole disease, that’s another shortcoming. But at the same time, if you can show in one of these models that you’re engaging your target then it also becomes a way of convincing the other stakeholders that you’ve developed some valuable starting point for potential therapeutics that could go into clinical development. So the in vivo studies are really a way of building confidence in potential partners, a proof of a mechanism, proof of validation, that your screening assays are informative.
 
So how do you work collaboratively within your group and you can tell me about any collaborations with others, what works well, what can be better? 
Well, AD projects are so complicated that you have to work collaboratively because no one person has enough skill to do all of the different aspects of it. We have had a number of academic collaborations, though we’ve started to limit those and now we’re mainly collaborating with CROs. One issue with working with academic organizations is that they don’t want to work for fee for service and our investors don’t want to have to negotiate licenses for everything that we’re developing. So that’s why we started to work more with CROs. We are anticipating very collaborative efforts with our partnering company and we intend to be doing most of the biology and some of the chemistry. Hopefully, the right partner will be doing the majority of the chemistry or the chemistry will be done through their CRO network. It will be very appealing, if we’re working with a major pharma and they’re doing the ADME, the P.K. and long term toxicity studies, for us to be able to search through each other’s databases around any jointly developed IP. So the way that I envision doing that is that we both use CDD Vault with bigger projects. So that’s definitely something that I’m sold on and that we’re looking forward to that in the future.
 
Is there any aspect of collaboration that you go outside of CDD Vault for or you hope that they put into CDD Vault in the future? 
There’s not anything that I can think of right now. But I certainly could ask my group to see if anybody else has any ideas from working in our CDD Vault because they may have suggestions, or some may become apparent when we get involved in a larger pharma collaboration. There may be some features that they’re used to with their own databases that we don’t even know exists, for instance. But right now there’s nothing that comes to mind. So, its meeting our needs at this stage very well.
 
Can I ask, have you had anything customized for you to date? Have you said ‘if we could have it done this way’ and CDD Vault has risen to the occasion? 
I don’t think we necessarily had things customized but I think Charlie (Weatherall) has helped us out a lot in terms of determining how to best set up our CDD Vault, how to import our data and do our calculations automatically off of the raw data given the way that we’re running our experiments. That requires a certain amount of back and forth to get it just right. So I think he’s been very receptive to anything that we needed to do, and that’s been good. We’re not heavily into computational modeling approaches at this time however this is something we may put more emphasis on in the future. We have gotten to the point where we have standardized a lot of our methods and now we’re enforcing best practices so that people don’t change the methods, in other words, we have S.O.P.’s that are signed off on and you have to use those when you run the assay which helps when you are looking at these parameters across many different compounds. So once you develop and fully validate an assay you don’t have to worry about it changing over time. This is just a question, but would there be value for companies like us who didn’t need to have a Merrill database, because they can get everything in one database with CDD Vault with versioning and an audit trail, I mean that’s something to think about but, for future upgrades.
 
So more of an IP-like module? 
Yes, a module where you could put in all of your documents, all of your SOPs, you know, all of your reports, all of your collaborators reports, things like that. I mean, in the Merrill database we have a write-up around our experiment and we have notebook references, and we have conclusions, you know, so they don’t take up a lot of physical space, in the sense that these aren’t very big files. Some of the imaging files probably are pretty big, but in general they are not very big files. So it’s something that if CDD Vault were to build in that functionality then a company like us wouldn’t need to have a Merrill database.
 
How far would an Electronic Laboratory Notebook go towards that? 
Yes, that’s what I think will be the solution. Right now our notebooks are physical notebooks but they’re all scanned, for instance. So, we are evaluating electronic laboratory notebooks at this time, but we haven’t decided to adopt one yet.
 
You know that in 2016, CDD is developing a fully functional electronic notebook? 
Yes, we’d like to think that we will certainly get to evaluate it. I think we know we have to migrate to an electronic format because at some point when we start to work with the large pharmas, it’s going to be easier for them to interface with us. We don’t want a situation where we have apples and oranges when we’re trying to compare things and creating resistance to collaboration just by virtue of the way they are, or we are handling information, so that’s important. I have seen also, that even the scanned notebooks have been extremely helpful because, you know, it’s a lot easier to access information electronically than going to the filing drawer, pulling out the notebook and finding the page. So we’re modernizing in those ways and would be interested to see the CDD Vault ELN that when it gets rolled out.
 
All right. So, I have a few questions about the process of who in your company uses CDD, who logs on, about how often they log on? Who does the searches? Do you have people in different functions using CDD Vault in different ways? Like, you have your biologists who are calculating curves, you have your medicinal chemists doing their SAR mining… What are the diverse roles or ways that people in your company are using CDD? 
Our biologists perform screening assays and import the data to CDD Vault and our medicinal chemist and scientists search and analyze the data. We also have a regular meeting that cycles through all of the functional areas. When we have those, we use CDD Vault to generate reports that are used to communicate the project status to the whole team. So we’re kind of using it both for internal reporting and then also for a little bit with the external reporting as well.
 
And then how do they securely get the information to you? 
They send us encrypted files with the SMILES codes and then we incorporate it into our CDD Vault. It’s working out really well. We are working with Allen Reitz from Fox-Chase Chemical Diversity Center, he’s a highly respected medicinal chemist.
 
Are you using the new visualization module in CDD Vault (CDD Vision)? 
Yes. We have started to use it to make these four dimensional plots and they’ve actually been very good for communicating our chemical space. In fact we had a poster at the Alzheimer’s Association international conference where we included a colorful plot in the poster directly from CDD Vault. I think it was a really good communication tool and some of the people coming up were big pharma med chemist-type guys and they were very interested in the plots. So it was a useful way to communicate to them what our series looks like across multi-parameters that are related to being drug-like. We’d like to expand off of those early analyses because, of course, we were very novice at using it. I saw today in Charlie’s presentation that there are multiple ways that we can enhance our use of it given how powerful the new Visualization module really is. Now the modeling feature is very interesting. We did go through that and do one model just to see how it worked. I can’t give you an answer as to whether it was predictive. I can’t tell you whether the model was effective at finding hits because, I think we built such a limited model for the first time that we tried it out, that whether the model was functional or not wasn’t that important. It was more like a proof-of-concept for the experience of building the model. But what I would like to do is to try to build a model to use as a way of separating real trends from outlier singletons. We have many singletons from our assays that are interesting and we’ve done work around three of them. We’ve focused mostly on one series because when you have a series you have more confidence in the underlying signal. When we performed a large screen of a hundred thousand compounds, some of our series had quite a large number of hits in them. And so if you’re getting thirty or forty hits, all of the same structural chemotype, it easier to focus there. But we have also found some success from the limited work that we’ve done on the singletons. So the question is, instead of trying to do synthesis around many singletons, could we do some virtual screening using a CDD built model and would some of those singletons come up more interesting than others and maybe help us to prioritize them. So I’d like to see if that works.
Another thing is, now that we have a lead series, we’re in discussion with some pharmas about whether we could go into their database and pull out similar structures that we can then test. So one of the first things that I would love to do is to run a validated CDD model on those structures to see if any hits come up. Then the real proof in the pudding is, as you know, do any of them work in the assay? So that’s really where you see the potential uses of the model. What would make the model valid is its ability to be predictive. But it doesn’t mean that it has to predict everything. If it’s predicting a subset and it’s pointing you in a direction, that would make it useful even if it’s not predicting everything perfectly. Because we use multiple approaches to solving these hard questions in searching for drug-like chemical series for Alzheimer’s disease. So again, I think around the singletons, which tend to get ignored anyway, that would be one area that I’d like to try to use the modeling more. Of course, you know my background is in molecular biophysics, which makes me not afraid of, or hesitant to use the modeling functionality.
 
Have your research efforts benefitted from your use of CDD Vault?
Absolutely, our research efforts have benefited using CDD Vault. It has been a very useful and enabling experience and I recommend it highly to potential users. Also, I am looking forward to seeing some of the other modules you are planning to roll out including the electronic laboratory notebook. Also, I want to take this time to thank you and Barry for the opportunity for me and Oligomerix to participate in the Spotlight!

This blog is authored by members of the CDD Vault community. CDD Vault is a hosted drug discovery informatics platform that securely manages both private and external biological and chemical data. It provides core functionality including chemical registration, structure activity relationship, chemical inventory, and electronic lab notebook capabilities!
CDD Vault: Drug Discovery Informatics your whole project team will embrace!
 






























James Moe | CDD Spotlight Interview


















































CDD Spotlight Interview with James Moe – President, CEO and a co-founder of Oligomerix
“We’re using CDD Vault as a way of storing our chemical structures, as a way of searching them, as a way of storing all of our assay data. We’re also using it for doing calculations, for analyzing our data, for creating reports and communicating the data to others, and then also, very importantly, for working securely with collaborators. So it’s been instrumental for all of those purposes.”


James Moe
President, CEO and a co-founder of Oligomerix
Dr. Moe has 20+ years industrial experience having held senior management positions in product development working on international teams in both early and late stage diagnostic, biotechnology and biopharmaceutical companies including Gene-Trak/Amoco Technology Ventures/Vysis, bioMerieux, and Mosaic Technologies. Prior to founding Oligomerix, he was Director of Product Development at Pyrosequencing, Senior Molecular Biologist at Spire Biomedical, and Director of Product Development at Q-RNA, Inc.
Dr. Moe received his Ph.D. degree in Molecular Biology/Molecular Biophysics from Wesleyan University, did his postdoctoral studies at Vanderbilt University in the Center for Molecular Toxicology where he was jointly appointed in the Biochemistry Department in the Medical School, and the Chemistry Department in the College of Arts and Sciences, and has an MBA degree with a concentration in entrepreneurial studies from Boston University.

Interviewed by Shirley Louise-May, Collaborative Drug Discovery, Inc.
I’m here with James Moe, President and CEO and a co-founder of Oligomerix. Oligomerix is a small biotech company primarily interested in addressing tauopathies. Tau is a protein in the central nervous system (CNS) that has been implicated in neurodegeneration if there are problems with the pathways downstream or upstream of tau. James, could you introduce us to the nature of Oligomerix’s research?
Sure, I’m James Moe, President and CEO of Oligomerix. We’re a company that’s focused on tau as a therapeutic target of neurodegeneration for Alzheimer’s disease (AD) but the work that we’re doing also applies to numerous other diseases. In fact, there’s about twenty different tauopathies that are known to date. Alzheimer’s disease (AD) is a dementia that is characterized by the pathological hallmarks, plaques and tangles composed primarily of aggregated amyloid beta or tau protein, respectively.
When we embarked on this project we chose to go after tau as a target based on the reproducible pattern of the development and spread of tau pathology during the course of AD, and because it was a differentiated approach from most other programs that were targeting the amyloid pathway. We also decided to further differentiate ourselves by targeting the oligomeric aggregates of tau rather than the larger and more inert fibril aggregates of tau. Now, after having embarked on this path about eleven years ago or so, most of the drug candidates developed against the amyloid target have failed in late stage clinical trials. So increasingly, there’s a lot of interest in Tau as a target and we have a pretty decent head start there. We’ve always believed that it’s an important target for AD, so we’re trying to discover drugs that prevent Tau from aggregating and developing its neurotoxic function.
 
Very Nice. Now that you’ve told me about the nature of your research, I’d like to hear more details of your approach, like what is the end goal, and what are either your modest or the more audacious goals of your programs? 
At Oligomerix we’re developing proximity-based screening assays for identifying inhibitors that prevent tau from self-associating at the beginning of the aggregation process. Our end goal would be to identify compounds that we could take into clinical studies – that is the ultimate end goal – and that would require us to bring a partner on board and to get to IND enabling studies. Right now we are in the candidate lead optimization stage for the project.
 
So how did you come up with the active compounds that you’ve found so far? Up until this point have you only used the biology as a guide? Have you been screening library compounds without medicinal chemistry support? 
No, we’ve used both supports. On the biology side, initially, when we decided to embark on a program to screen against tau as a target, we wanted a solid foundation for the research. So we decided not to use the fibrillation type of assays that people were using because they are not physiological, that was our departure from the norm. Secondly, most other researchers in the field didn’t use full length tau for technical reasons. Third, most everybody else was using tau sequences with mutations that are not present in AD. Finally, they were using aggregation enhancers or facilitators in their assays. We decided, since we’re trying to prevent tau-tau interaction by development of a proximity assay, that we needed to work with full length tau. Because – importantly – if we prevent tau from aggregating, we would want to have normal tau that could still be functional or would be able to undergo normal clearance. In choosing this path we were able to discover, for the first time, tau’s ability to self-truncate once it forms these types of aggregates. Other people missed that because they were using already truncated tau.
Initially, our medicinal chemistry was internal and basic – looking through our hits and then designing new structures. When our medicinal chemist left, at the time we thought it would be a very temporary solution, we decided to do our chemistry through a CRO. We still work with a third party who does all our medicinal chemistry, but have now brought on a consultant medicinal chemist and intend to bring this function in-house.
Ultimately, our end goal is to enable a large pharma to more rapidly bring candidates into the clinic. We, as a small entity, would not be able to do that on our own or in a timely manner, to bring the funding along to do that, or to have the expertise for the full ride. However, we would like to enable our strategic partner to do that to enable our global common audacious goal of finding effective therapeutics for AD.
 
OK. At Oligomerix, what are the means to the end (however you interpret that question)? 
So the means are – my interpretation – how do you get there? So that’s the money question, that’s how I interpret it. Well, we started this project with two scientists plus myself and got Oligomerix started by writing an NIH grant – an SBIR. That’s how we got the company off the ground. NIH has been a very good partner. We’ve raised our own money, too. Actually, half of the money we’ve raised comes from NIH grants and the other half from investors. Most of our investors are individual investors although we have one institutional investor right now, Wheatley Partners. Ultimately, it’s the investment dollars that come in that enable this program. So that’s what I would interpret as the means. But also, to be in this business, you need to have novel technology. In terms of Oligomerix, the majority of the technology we are using we’ve developed inside the company. So, in other words, we created it, we’re not in-licensing our novel methods from an academic institution. I think that sets us apart as a small company in this field.
 
In the area of tauopathies, what new techniques or information have you found particularly interesting? 
Well, as an example of one of the interesting things, because we were working with full length tau, we found that tau was self-truncating, and the question is ‘What is the purpose of that function?’ Specifically, tau has an intrinsic proteolytic function, so that when it forms certain types of aggregates, it self-truncates. So, the real question is whether the function is pathological or protective? In trying to understand why this function may have developed in tau, we noted that tau is a protein that stabilizes microtubules. So why would it have an intrinsic proteolytic function? Well, it also turns out that tau is involved in the stress response system. Work in other labs has shown that if you treat cells in culture with oxidative conditions, tau goes into the nucleus and somehow reduces the number of double strand breaks in the DNA. I speculate that this novel function may be involved in that process and that maybe, this function is going awry in the rest of the neuron in AD. This is consistent with our finding that expression of some of these truncated fragments of tau is toxic. From a purely scientific perspective, tau is a fascinating protein to be working on as its normal and disease-related functions are still being unraveled inside and outside of neurons.
 
So can I just ask a clarification – is tau’s proteolytic function something that you believe should be only functional in the nucleus and in a disease state it’s happening outside the nucleus? 
Yes. However, there may be other normal functions for tau proteolytic activity, as well both inside and outside of cells that we have not considered.
 
OK, so how does Oligomerix use CDD Vault? And why did you choose CDD Vault? 
One of the reasons why we chose CDD Vault over other packages that we were looking at was that we felt that CDD fit well, given that we’re a smaller entity, and we didn’t want to choose packages where we thought that big pharma was going to be able to muscle away the attention of the provider. So we thought that they fit well with our size and they had all the features that we needed. Indeed, their customer service has been exemplary!
How are we using it? Well we’re using CDD Vault as a way of storing our chemical structures, as a way of searching them, as a way of storing all of our assay data. We’re also using it for doing calculations, for analyzing our data, for creating reports and communicating the data to others, and then also, very importantly, for working securely with collaborators. So it’s been instrumental for all of those purposes. And when we get into a partnership, we are looking forward to both ourselves and our partnering company being able to access some of the same data and contributing data into the same database, CDD Vault is very functional for that. Another primary concern is having a database where we have better security over our molecules.
 
And you believe that you have better security with a cloud-hosted solution like CDD Vault than you might have had in-house? 
I think so, yes.
 
And in securely exchanging data with partners? 
Yes.
 
So, I have to ask if you’ve ever gone the DropBox option? 
We need more powerful drug discovery capabilities than merely a file exchange folder provides. However, we now use DropBox for standard documents as well.
 
But it has no functionality? 
Yeah, basically. We are also using Merrill database for data sharing and have a lot of other types of data that we put in the Merrill database. We just keep it open all the time because it’s pretty cost effective, given the amount of data we have relative to say a larger company. You know, those are the two kinds of cloud-based type hosted solutions we use at Oligomerix; CDD Vault and Merrill. Then there’s still a lot we’re doing internally. We are looking for more ways to leverage using the cloud, but at the same time we want to be smart about doing it, so we’re sort of being careful in how we implement it and only use providers with trusted track records like CDD, which has been securely hosting sensitive data for a long-time.
 
So, how long you’ve been using CDD Vault? If you want to, can you enumerate some of the things that you like about it and some of the things that you hope will either be coming in future upgrades or things that you think would, if they were addressed, make the product even better. 
Yes, I can easily think of two or three things we like about it. I think the search functionalities have been very useful. We’ve been happy with those and also the reports that we create. Also, being able to easily update protocols. It’s been very good too, as we develop new assays, then, to design them so that we can use them to calculate IC50’s and derived parameters like that. I also really like that the physico-chemical properties are present so you can, if you’re making a report, check off the ones you want and that sort of thing.
 
How long have you been using CDD Vault? 
Let’s see, I’m trying to think exactly. We are in our third year now using CDD Vault.
 
Right, and you do mostly compound-centric searches or assay-centric searches? I mean, what kind of searches do you most commonly use? 
We have many of both compound- and assay-centric searches. One thing we haven’t done, is, put a lot of the imaging data into CDD vault, but that’s something I’d like to do in the future. We do have that kind of data, you know, but right now people maintain that separately. One issue that I already talked to Charlie Weatherall about is in the graphing of curves. When you have outliers on your plots, you can sequester the outliers but it doesn’t automatically change the axis of the plot. We haven’t yet figured out how to change the axis automatically but it seems there must be a way. So that part, I think, is one little area that could be improved, however the good news is that you can manually remove outliers. But these are little things that could be addressed, as we don’t get that many outliers. I was telling one of my technicians, ‘just don’t have outliers and we won’t have to worry about it!’
 
Sure, I bet he loved that. All right, can you also describe the reports that you generate? Are they primarily for internal use? 
Yes, internally or with our CRO, we selectively and securely share our CDD Vault also with our CRO. But we create our reports with password protection, so, a little different than what others do, the good news is with CDD Vault you can provide different levels of access privileges to different projects. So when we create an Excel file then, if it has structures, we save it as a password-protected file and then when we send it to our CRO’s that way. Then, in a separate email we send them the password. That, we feel, gives us some level of security that somebody won’t intercept both messages and get sensitive information. We just want to be cognizant that we’re protecting our structural information more than anything.
 
All right. So why don’t you describe a memorable interaction you’ve recently had with another brilliant scientist? 
Well, when I was at the Alzheimer’s International conference this year, there was a lot of talk about Tau PET ligands. As some people who work in the field know, over the last few years there has been a lot of advancement in amyloid research because of amyloid imaging capability. Now, finally, tau PET ligands are available and are being validated. What was fascinating was, when you look at amyloid and tau imaging patterns in the same brains, you might have both amyloid pathology and tau pathology. And if you look at where the two pathologies are overlapping you see regions of hypo-connectivity. So, in other words, because of this hypo-connectivity or concentrated protein aggregation, there is the potential for loss of function in those regions. Nobody really has demonstrated that, but when I was talking to the Chief Scientist of Advent and he pointed those regions out to me, I thought that was very fascinating because it implies that there’s a lot of neuronal loss occurring in the places where the two pathologies are occurring in the same region. And I think that’s saying something about the disease mechanism, that maybe both pathologies are necessary for synaptic loss. I think it’s fascinating because for so many years, researchers have been struggling to understand what the relationship between these two pathologies. So I think we’re finally starting to get at that becoming clearer with this new imaging data. What I found was amazing, sitting in that hall that day, seeing a lot of good presentations of tau imaging data, that this is all new – it’s new to everybody in this room. These are the world’s experts on tau imaging and to hear them, sitting there, seeing it, at the same time with everyone else, it felt like, wow, it’s almost like you’re looking up the road and you know these are the tools that are going to help us. They’re going to help us find treatments that actually can cure or slow down or halt or arrest neurodegeneration and that’s really exciting. What a treat, as a scientist, to be sitting in that room.
 
What technologies do you use for your research? And why?
When we embarked upon this project, we developed a novel proximity screening assay where we were able to screen large chemical libraries and then used cellular assays as secondary screens. Then, to demonstrate that our screening assays are selecting compounds that will work in vivo, we conduct mouse studies. Yet, the problem with doing mouse studies is that there isn’t any mouse model that really recapitulates Alzheimer’s disease and so you’re only looking at a mechanistic piece of the disease. In our case, because tau was our target, we were looking at the tauopathy models. Now, nine out of ten of those models have frontal temporal dementia mutations that are completely irrelevant to Alzheimer’s disease so that’s one of the shortcomings. Being a mechanistic piece of the disease and not the whole disease, that’s another shortcoming. But at the same time, if you can show in one of these models that you’re engaging your target then it also becomes a way of convincing the other stakeholders that you’ve developed some valuable starting point for potential therapeutics that could go into clinical development. So the in vivo studies are really a way of building confidence in potential partners, a proof of a mechanism, proof of validation, that your screening assays are informative.
 
So how do you work collaboratively within your group and you can tell me about any collaborations with others, what works well, what can be better? 
Well, AD projects are so complicated that you have to work collaboratively because no one person has enough skill to do all of the different aspects of it. We have had a number of academic collaborations, though we’ve started to limit those and now we’re mainly collaborating with CROs. One issue with working with academic organizations is that they don’t want to work for fee for service and our investors don’t want to have to negotiate licenses for everything that we’re developing. So that’s why we started to work more with CROs. We are anticipating very collaborative efforts with our partnering company and we intend to be doing most of the biology and some of the chemistry. Hopefully, the right partner will be doing the majority of the chemistry or the chemistry will be done through their CRO network. It will be very appealing, if we’re working with a major pharma and they’re doing the ADME, the P.K. and long term toxicity studies, for us to be able to search through each other’s databases around any jointly developed IP. So the way that I envision doing that is that we both use CDD Vault with bigger projects. So that’s definitely something that I’m sold on and that we’re looking forward to that in the future.
 
Is there any aspect of collaboration that you go outside of CDD Vault for or you hope that they put into CDD Vault in the future? 
There’s not anything that I can think of right now. But I certainly could ask my group to see if anybody else has any ideas from working in our CDD Vault because they may have suggestions, or some may become apparent when we get involved in a larger pharma collaboration. There may be some features that they’re used to with their own databases that we don’t even know exists, for instance. But right now there’s nothing that comes to mind. So, its meeting our needs at this stage very well.
 
Can I ask, have you had anything customized for you to date? Have you said ‘if we could have it done this way’ and CDD Vault has risen to the occasion? 
I don’t think we necessarily had things customized but I think Charlie (Weatherall) has helped us out a lot in terms of determining how to best set up our CDD Vault, how to import our data and do our calculations automatically off of the raw data given the way that we’re running our experiments. That requires a certain amount of back and forth to get it just right. So I think he’s been very receptive to anything that we needed to do, and that’s been good. We’re not heavily into computational modeling approaches at this time however this is something we may put more emphasis on in the future. We have gotten to the point where we have standardized a lot of our methods and now we’re enforcing best practices so that people don’t change the methods, in other words, we have S.O.P.’s that are signed off on and you have to use those when you run the assay which helps when you are looking at these parameters across many different compounds. So once you develop and fully validate an assay you don’t have to worry about it changing over time. This is just a question, but would there be value for companies like us who didn’t need to have a Merrill database, because they can get everything in one database with CDD Vault with versioning and an audit trail, I mean that’s something to think about but, for future upgrades.
 
So more of an IP-like module? 
Yes, a module where you could put in all of your documents, all of your SOPs, you know, all of your reports, all of your collaborators reports, things like that. I mean, in the Merrill database we have a write-up around our experiment and we have notebook references, and we have conclusions, you know, so they don’t take up a lot of physical space, in the sense that these aren’t very big files. Some of the imaging files probably are pretty big, but in general they are not very big files. So it’s something that if CDD Vault were to build in that functionality then a company like us wouldn’t need to have a Merrill database.
 
How far would an Electronic Laboratory Notebook go towards that? 
Yes, that’s what I think will be the solution. Right now our notebooks are physical notebooks but they’re all scanned, for instance. So, we are evaluating electronic laboratory notebooks at this time, but we haven’t decided to adopt one yet.
 
You know that in 2016, CDD is developing a fully functional electronic notebook? 
Yes, we’d like to think that we will certainly get to evaluate it. I think we know we have to migrate to an electronic format because at some point when we start to work with the large pharmas, it’s going to be easier for them to interface with us. We don’t want a situation where we have apples and oranges when we’re trying to compare things and creating resistance to collaboration just by virtue of the way they are, or we are handling information, so that’s important. I have seen also, that even the scanned notebooks have been extremely helpful because, you know, it’s a lot easier to access information electronically than going to the filing drawer, pulling out the notebook and finding the page. So we’re modernizing in those ways and would be interested to see the CDD Vault ELN that when it gets rolled out.
 
All right. So, I have a few questions about the process of who in your company uses CDD, who logs on, about how often they log on? Who does the searches? Do you have people in different functions using CDD Vault in different ways? Like, you have your biologists who are calculating curves, you have your medicinal chemists doing their SAR mining… What are the diverse roles or ways that people in your company are using CDD? 
Our biologists perform screening assays and import the data to CDD Vault and our medicinal chemist and scientists search and analyze the data. We also have a regular meeting that cycles through all of the functional areas. When we have those, we use CDD Vault to generate reports that are used to communicate the project status to the whole team. So we’re kind of using it both for internal reporting and then also for a little bit with the external reporting as well.
 
And then how do they securely get the information to you? 
They send us encrypted files with the SMILES codes and then we incorporate it into our CDD Vault. It’s working out really well. We are working with Allen Reitz from Fox-Chase Chemical Diversity Center, he’s a highly respected medicinal chemist.
 
Are you using the new visualization module in CDD Vault (CDD Vision)? 
Yes. We have started to use it to make these four dimensional plots and they’ve actually been very good for communicating our chemical space. In fact we had a poster at the Alzheimer’s Association international conference where we included a colorful plot in the poster directly from CDD Vault. I think it was a really good communication tool and some of the people coming up were big pharma med chemist-type guys and they were very interested in the plots. So it was a useful way to communicate to them what our series looks like across multi-parameters that are related to being drug-like. We’d like to expand off of those early analyses because, of course, we were very novice at using it. I saw today in Charlie’s presentation that there are multiple ways that we can enhance our use of it given how powerful the new Visualization module really is. Now the modeling feature is very interesting. We did go through that and do one model just to see how it worked. I can’t give you an answer as to whether it was predictive. I can’t tell you whether the model was effective at finding hits because, I think we built such a limited model for the first time that we tried it out, that whether the model was functional or not wasn’t that important. It was more like a proof-of-concept for the experience of building the model. But what I would like to do is to try to build a model to use as a way of separating real trends from outlier singletons. We have many singletons from our assays that are interesting and we’ve done work around three of them. We’ve focused mostly on one series because when you have a series you have more confidence in the underlying signal. When we performed a large screen of a hundred thousand compounds, some of our series had quite a large number of hits in them. And so if you’re getting thirty or forty hits, all of the same structural chemotype, it easier to focus there. But we have also found some success from the limited work that we’ve done on the singletons. So the question is, instead of trying to do synthesis around many singletons, could we do some virtual screening using a CDD built model and would some of those singletons come up more interesting than others and maybe help us to prioritize them. So I’d like to see if that works.
Another thing is, now that we have a lead series, we’re in discussion with some pharmas about whether we could go into their database and pull out similar structures that we can then test. So one of the first things that I would love to do is to run a validated CDD model on those structures to see if any hits come up. Then the real proof in the pudding is, as you know, do any of them work in the assay? So that’s really where you see the potential uses of the model. What would make the model valid is its ability to be predictive. But it doesn’t mean that it has to predict everything. If it’s predicting a subset and it’s pointing you in a direction, that would make it useful even if it’s not predicting everything perfectly. Because we use multiple approaches to solving these hard questions in searching for drug-like chemical series for Alzheimer’s disease. So again, I think around the singletons, which tend to get ignored anyway, that would be one area that I’d like to try to use the modeling more. Of course, you know my background is in molecular biophysics, which makes me not afraid of, or hesitant to use the modeling functionality.
 
Have your research efforts benefitted from your use of CDD Vault?
Absolutely, our research efforts have benefited using CDD Vault. It has been a very useful and enabling experience and I recommend it highly to potential users. Also, I am looking forward to seeing some of the other modules you are planning to roll out including the electronic laboratory notebook. Also, I want to take this time to thank you and Barry for the opportunity for me and Oligomerix to participate in the Spotlight!

This blog is authored by members of the CDD Vault community. CDD Vault is a hosted drug discovery informatics platform that securely manages both private and external biological and chemical data. It provides core functionality including chemical registration, structure activity relationship, chemical inventory, and electronic lab notebook capabilities!
CDD Vault: Drug Discovery Informatics your whole project team will embrace!
 





























JAMES P. MOE AND ASSOCIATE, INC. Credit report, products, contacts













 Florida






Search









    JAMES P. MOE AND ASSOCIATE, INC.











Company number P99000064726
        

Status Inactive
        

FEI number 593585334
        

Company Type Domestic for Profit
        

Home State FL
        

Last activity date 9/16/2005
        

Date Of Incorporation 7/14/1999
        

Principal Address
            9196 W. HARBOR ISLE CT., CRYSTAL RIVER, FL, 34429
            


Mailing Address 9196 W. HARBOR ISLE CT., CRYSTAL RIVER, FL, 34429
        
JAMES P. MOE AND ASSOCIATE, INC. Principals

Director
                Moe James P
                 


Address
                9196 W. HARBOR ISLE CT., CRYSTAL RIVER, FL, 34429
                 



Director
                Moe Helen M
                 


Address
                9196 W. HARBOR ISLE CT., CRYSTAL RIVER, FL, 34429
                 







Last Annual Reports

2004 2/16/2004
            

2004 2/16/2004
            

2003 1/21/2003
            
Registered Agent

Agent Name MOE                 JAMES         P (p)
        

Agent Address
                9196 W. HARBOR ISLE CT., CRYSTAL RIVER, FL, 34429
                

JAMES P. MOE AND ASSOCIATE, INC. Events

1 ADMIN DISSOLUTION   FOR ANNUAL REPORT
            

filedDate 9/16/2005
            

Description
JAMES P. MOE AND ASSOCIATE, INC. has been set up 7/14/1999 in state FL.  
The current status of the business is Inactive. The JAMES P. MOE AND ASSOCIATE, INC. principal adress is 9196 W. HARBOR ISLE CT., CRYSTAL RIVER, FL, 34429. 
Meanwhile you can send your letters to 9196 W. HARBOR ISLE CT., CRYSTAL RIVER, FL, 34429. 
The company`s registered agent is MOE                 JAMES         P 9196 W. HARBOR ISLE CT., CRYSTAL RIVER, FL, 34429.  
The company`s management are Director - Moe James P, Director - Moe Helen M. The last significant event in the company history is ADMIN DISSOLUTION   FOR ANNUAL REPORT which is dated by 9/16/2005. This decision is take in action on unknown.  The company annual reports filed on Annual reports – 2/16/2004.






Comprehensive Report about this company
        





(view sample)








Similar Companies
JAMES P. MORAN, INC.
JAMES P. MORGAN MEMORIAL PARK AND BOTANICAL GARDEN, INC.
JAMES P. MORRIS WALLCOVERING SERVICE, LLC
JAMES P. MOSHER AND ASSOCIATES, INC.
JAMES P. MUIR, DDS, PL
JAMES P. MYDDELTON, III, P.A.











Moe James D in Stevens Point, Wisconsin with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomeStevens Point, WIMoe James DStevens Point, WI Moe James DAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection1. Hom, James D, DDS3130 Oak AveStevens Point, WI 54481(715) 341-4993DentistsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection2. Hom, James D3100 Oak AveStevens Point, WI 54481(715) 341-4993DentistsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection3. D Hom James DDS Sc114 S Main StPlainfield, WI 54966(715) 335-4212DentistsOral & Maxillofacial SurgeryWebsiteServicesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection4. D Hom James DDS Sc5648 Main StAuburndale, WI 54412(715) 652-3100DentistsDental HygienistsDental ClinicsWebsiteServicesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection5. Weis D James3100 Eagle AveWausau, WI 54401(715) 842-4444AttorneysGeneral Practice AttorneysWebsiteServicesSponsored LinksShowing1-5
of 5resultsMap ViewSponsoredDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glass 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback











 













 




JAMES E MOE - VIDOR, TX - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



TX



VIDOR



Business Services, Nec



Business Services At Non-commercial Site



                            JAMES E MOE
                                    



 





















J 


JAMES E MOE
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



445 CHINESE ELM ST VIDOR, TX 77662
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded 2010
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $57,000.00
 Employee Count --
 Industries Business Services At Non-commercial Site
 Contacts --







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2010, James E Moe has been providing Business Services At Non-commercial Site from Vidor. James E Moe has estimated annual revenues of $57,000.00 and also employs an estimated 1 employees. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







J

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 






Moe James Found! | Check For Arrests, Warrants 










































 


 





 Moe James Found!!  Check For Arrests, Warrants 
    Show Me Moe's Records 





 Please take into consideration that Moe James's records can only be used for personal reasons. For example locating old friends and family or verifying if a person has criminal history and if they can be trusted, to name a few.

You cannot use these records for consumer credit, tenant screening, employment, insurance qualifications or anything else that may be subjected to the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq.
Moe James's records do not contain credit scores and reports. We and our partners are not a consumer reporting agency.
Click here to continue.
 





 Discover Everything You Ever Wanted to Know About Moe James 


 

Arrest Records, Warrants, DWI and MugshotsIf Moe’s ever had a run-in with the law then his records will show where, when and why.


Addresses, Phone and EmailMoe’s record will show current and past mailing addresses, phone numbers and any email addresses he’s had.


Marriage, Divorce and Birth RecordsImportant events from Moe’s life have been compiled from state and local county.

  

Sex Offender RegistryFind out instantly if Moe is registered as a sex offender and if he is a threat.


Hidden Online ProfilesFind out all of Moe’s online social media profiles and any hidden ones you’re not supposed to know about.


Assets, Businesses and LicensesFind out if Moe is hiding any assets, owns any businesses and what licenses they are registered for.

  Show Me Moe's Records 


 Instant Access Anywhere and Anytime 


 

100% Anonymous and Instant
In a few minutes from now you'll get full access to Moe's background in the comforts of home.
Moe will not know you are looking up their background and pulling records.
With state of the art connection your search is also secure from prying eyes.


 


 Look Up Anyone You Want 



 Get Moe's Records + Unlimited Searches
In addition to getting a full background on Moe James, which includes contact info, arrest records, assets, bankruptcies and more, you'll also get full access to our database 24/7.
Look up anyone else you want so long as they reside in the United States of America.
Whether it's celebrities, family members or friends you're not restricted on your search.
  Get Me Moe's Records and Unlimited Searches on Anyone I Want 
     




Copyright 2016 - 911arrests.com - All Rights Reserved 








































Loading Your Search Results - PeopleLooker.com























Updating Data On {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{nameize mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}} {{#validLocation city}}in {{city}}{{#validLocation state}},{{/validLocation}} {{/validLocation}}{{#validLocation state}}{{#unless city}}in {{/unless}}{{uppercase state}}{{/validLocation}}
Important! PeopleLooker uses real public records. The information may be surprising.












Less than 30 seconds remaining


Continue to Results 







Now
We look up all people named {{nameize fn}} {{nameize ln}}.




Next
You pick which one you're looking for.




Then
We search our database for info on them.




Hooray!
You get your report!












Where does {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{uppercase mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}}
live?
Please help us narrow down your search











All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





I'm not sure














Please enter a full name
Please help us narrow down your search







First Name:

Please Enter First Name


Last Name:

Please Enter Last Name












































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





















